ru: Стиль носочной части: С отдельными пальцами; Усиленный мысок; Бесшовный; С раздвоенным мыском (таби); Стандартный шов; Другое
da: Tåstil for sok: Individuelle tæer; Forstærket; Sømløs; Delt (Tabi); Standard-søm; Andet
sl-SI: Stil prstnega dela nogavice: Posamezni; Ojačani; Brezšivni; Deljeni (Tabi); Standardni šiv; Drugo
zh-CN: 袜头款式: 独立五趾; 加固型; 无缝; 分趾（二趾袜）; 标准缝合; 其他
pl: Styl części przedniej skarpety: Pięciopalczaste; Wzmocnione palce; Bezszwowe; Z oddzielonym palcem (Tabi); Standardowy szew; Inny
th: รูปแบบปลายถุงเท้า: แยกนิ้ว; เสริมความแข็งแรง; ไร้รอยตะเข็บ; แยกนิ้วโป้ง (ทาบิ); ตะเข็บมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu tất chân: Ngón rời; Gia cố; Không đường may; Xẻ ngón (Tabi); Đường may tiêu chuẩn; Khác
hr-HR: Stil čarapa s vrhom: Pojedinačni prsti; Ojačano; Bez šavova; Odvojeni (Tabi); Standardni šav; Ostalo
cs: Styl ponožkové špičky: Prstové; Zesílená; Bezešvá; Oddělená (Tabi); Standardní šev; Jiné
fi: Sukan kärkimalli: Erilliset varpaat; Vahvistettu; Saumaton; Jaettu (Tabi); Vakiomallinen sauma; Muu
es: Estilo de la punta del calcetín: Individual; Reforzado; Sin costuras; Separado (tabi); Costura estándar; Otro
lt-LT: Kojinių pirštų srities stilius: Atskiri pirštai; Sustiprinta pirštų dalis; Besiūlė pirštų dalis; Perskirti („Tabi“); Standartinė siūlė; Kita
sv: Strumpans tåstil: Individuella tår; Förstärkt; Sömlös; Delad (tabi); Standardsöm; Övrigt
el: Στυλ κάλτσας με δάχτυλα: Μεμονωμένα δάχτυλα; Ενισχυμένη; Χωρίς ραφή; Χωριστά δάχτυλα (Tabi); Κανονική ραφή; Άλλο
en: Sock toe style: Individual; Reinforced; Seamless; Split (Tabi); Standard seam; Other
sk-SK: Štýl špičky ponožky: Samostatné; Zosilnený; Bezšvový; Oddelené (Tabi); Štandardný šev; Iný
tr: Çorap burun stili: Parmaklı; Güçlendirilmiş; Dikişsiz; Ayrık (Tabi); Standart dikiş; Diğer
hu: Zokniorr fazonja: Ujjas; Megerősített; Varrat nélküli; Kétujjas (Tabi); Normál varrat; Egyéb
ja: 靴下つま先スタイル: 5本指; 補強; シームレス; スプリット (足袋); スタンダードシーム; その他
de: Zehenstil der Socke: Einzelzehen; Verstärkt; Nahtlos; Geteilt (Tabi); Standardnaht; Andere
pt-BR: Meia estilo dos dedos: Dedos individuais; Reforçada; Sem costura; Dividida (Tabi); Costura padrão; Outro
it: Stile della punta della calza: Dita separate; Rinforzata; Senza cuciture; Divisa (Tabi); Cucitura standard; Altro
bg-BG: Стил на пръстите на чорапа: Индивидуални пръсти; Подсилени; Безшевни; Разделени (Таби); Стандартен шев; Друго
ro-RO: Stil de vârf al șosetei: Individual; Întărit; Fără cusături; Separat (Tabi); Cusătură standard; Altele
nb: Sokketå-stil: Individuell; Forsterket; Sømløs; Delt (Tabi); Standard søm; Annet
zh-TW: 襪尖樣式: 五趾; 加固; 無縫; 分趾; 標準縫線; 其他
nl: Sok teenstijl: Individueel; Verstevigd; Naadloos; Gesplitst (Tabi); Standaardnaad; Anders
fr: Type de pointe de la chaussette: Individuel; Renforcé; Sans couture; Fendu (Tabi); Couture standard; Autre
pt-PT: Estilo da ponta da meia: Individual; Reforçado; Sem costuras; Separado (Tabi); Costura normal; Outro
ko: 양말 발가락 스타일: 개별형; 보강형; 무봉제; 스플릿(타비); 기본 봉제; 기타